Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.455

Statewide forensic nurse coordination program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of health hereby creates a program to ensure statewide forensic nurse coordination.

(2) The statewide forensic nurse coordination program shall:

(a) Provide technical assistance to adult, adolescent, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner programs and forensic nurse examiner programs across the state;

(b) Identify and alleviate barriers faced by hospitals relating to creating, maintaining, or operating adult adolescent, or pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner programs or forensic nurse examiner programs;

(c) Conduct a statewide needs assessment of adult, adolescent, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner programs and forensic nurse examiner programs;

(d) Provide and maintain centralized resources for adult, adolescent, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiners and forensic nurse examiners;

(e) Oversee the supply, distribution, and content of Washington standardized sexual assault kits;

(f) Develop and update standards of care for forensic exams and documentation;

(g) Assess and maintain standards for forensic nurse training curriculum for ongoing and didactic training, including preceptorship, by:

(i) Providing technical assistance to promote consistent trainings across the state with variances as needed;

(ii) Providing information on trauma-informed and cultural competency standards; and

(iii) Facilitating surveys and other mechanisms to provide forensic exam patients the ability to give feedback on the patients' experiences that can be used to enhance forensic nurse training standards;

(h) Coordinate statewide forensic nurse trainings;

(i) Develop standardized forensic nurse training videos for hospitals and perform on-site trainings at hospitals;

(j) Develop plans to ensure statewide coverage and availability of adult, adolescent, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiners and forensic nurse examiners;

(k) Maintain and collect data on the availability of adult, adolescent, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiners and forensic nurse examiners;

(l) Coordinate with victim advocacy services;

(m) Provide organizational and capacity building support to adult, adolescent, and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner programs and forensic nurse examiner programs; and

(n) Integrate resources for victims of sexual assault into existing local or state referral hotlines.

[ 2024 c 297 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 297: See note following RCW 7.68.127.